src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-ruykk_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ruâkk â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Nom: ruâkk
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Gen: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Acc: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Ill: ruõkˈku
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Loc: ruâǥǥast
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Com: ruâǥǥain
     ruâkk+N+Ess: ruâkkan
     ruâkk+N+Par: ruâkkad
     ruâkk+N+Sg+Abe: [ruâǥǥtaa, ruâǥǥtää]
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Nom: ruâǥǥ
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Gen: ruâǥǥai
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Acc: ruâǥǥaid
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Ill: ruâǥǥaid
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Loc: ruâǥǥain
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Com: ruâǥǥaivuiʹm
     ruâkk+N+Pl+Abe: [ruâǥǥaitaa, ruâǥǥaitää]
     ruâkk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ruõǥǥuž
